Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.28
Purchase, defined.

Purchase means any transfer of title or possession, exchange, barter, lease, or rental, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means, of property for a consideration, including a transfer of the possession of property in which the seller retains the title as security for the payment of the price and a transfer for a consideration of property which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer. Purchase also means the provision of a service for a consideration.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 20;

Laws 2002, LB 1085, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 77-2702.11;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 32.